Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF37.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 1282HH (2) 91 ll/js H.F. 37 Section 1. Section 331.752, subsection 5, Code 2025, is 1 amended to read as follows: 2 5. The resolution changing the status of a county attorney 3 shall state the initial annual salary to be paid to the county 4 attorney when the full-time or part-time status is effective. 5 The annual salary specified in the resolution shall remain 6 effective until changed as provided in section 331.907 . Except 7 in counties having a population of more than two hundred 8 thousand, the annual salary of a full-time county attorney 9 shall be an amount which is between forty-five percent and one 10 hundred percent of the annual salary received by a district 11 court judge. 12